Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.300

State treasurer to report annually on university assets held in trust.

It shall be the duty of the state treasurer to make a report to the board of regents of Washington State University on or as soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year, which shall contain a complete detailed statement as to the status of any university assets held in trust by the treasurer and the annual income therefrom.

[ 1977 c 75 s 23; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.300. Prior: 1899 c 9 s 2; RRS s 7850. Formerly RCW 28.80.230.]

NOTES:

College funds: RCW 43.79.100 through 43.79.140.